Illinois, session 104th, SB1322.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Mental 5Health Professional Career Scholarship Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Eligible noncitizen" means an individual who is not a 8permanent resident of the United States and does not meet the 9eligibility criteria for federal student assistance but who 10does meet all of the following criteria:11        (1) the individual resided with the individual's 12    parent or guardian while attending a public or nonpublic 13    high school in this State;14        (2) the individual graduated from a public or 15    nonpublic high school in this State or received a State of 16    Illinois High School Diploma;17        (3) the individual attended school in this State for 18    at least 3 years as of the date the individual graduated 19    from high school in this State or received a State of 20    Illinois High School Diploma;21        (4) the individual provides an affidavit stating that 22    the individual will file an application to become a 23    permanent resident of the United States at the earliest   SB1322- 2 -LRB104 07394 LNS 17435 b1    opportunity the individual is eligible to do so; and2        (5) the individual has not established a residence 3    outside of this State.4    "Qualifying degree" means a degree with a focus on 5professional counseling, professional therapy, social work, 6psychology, or psychiatry or a degree to become a mental 7health nurse practitioner or psychiatric pharmacist. 8    Section 10. Mental Health Professional Career Scholarship 9Program.10    (a) In addition to scholarships awarded under the Equity 11and Representation in Health Care Act and the Mental Health 12Graduate Education Scholarship Act, the Commission shall 13create the Mental Health Professional Career Scholarship 14Program to award scholarships to Illinois students pursuing a 15mental health professional career in order to increase 16diversity rates by recruiting individuals to work in mental 17health fields in the public sector or mental health jobs that 18have a high demand for new employees and retain those 19individuals. 20    (b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, the 21Commission shall, each year, receive and consider applications 22for scholarship assistance under this Act. An applicant is 23eligible for a scholarship under this Act if the Commission 24finds that the applicant meets all of the following 25qualifications:   SB1322- 3 -LRB104 07394 LNS 17435 b1        (1) The applicant is a United States citizen or 2    eligible noncitizen and a resident of this State. 3        (2) The applicant has graduated from an approved high 4    school, as defined in the Higher Education Student 5    Assistance Act, or has received a State of Illinois High 6    School Diploma. 7        (3) The applicant is enrolled in an institution of 8    higher learning, as defined in the Higher Education 9    Student Assistance Act, is pursuing a qualifying degree, 10    and is maintaining a cumulative grade point average of at 11    least a 2.5 on a 4.0 scale or the equivalent as determined 12    by the Commission. 13    (c) Scholarship recipients shall be selected from among 14qualified applicants. However, preference may be given to the 15following: 16        (1) applicants who demonstrate academic excellence; 17        (2) applicants who demonstrate financial need; 18        (3) an applicant who is a minority student, as defined 19    in Section 50 of Higher Education Student Assistance Act; 20    and 21        (4) previous recipients of assistance under this Act, 22    provided they continue to maintain eligibility and 23    satisfactory academic progress, as determined by the 24    institution of higher learning at which they are enrolled. 25    Section 15. Amount of assistance.   SB1322- 4 -LRB104 07394 LNS 17435 b1    (a) The total amount of scholarship assistance awarded by 2the Commission under this Act to an individual in any given 3fiscal year, when added to other financial assistance awarded 4to that individual for that year, shall not exceed the cost of 5attendance at the institution of higher learning at which the 6student is enrolled. 7    (b) A recipient may receive up to 8 semesters of 8scholarship assistance under this Act. 9    Section 20. Applications for assistance. All applications 10for scholarship assistance to be awarded under this Act shall 11be made to the Commission in a form as set forth by the 12Commission. The form of application and the information 13required to be set forth in the application shall be 14determined by the Commission, and the Commission shall require 15eligible applicants to submit with their applications such 16supporting documents as the Commission deems necessary.  17    Section 25. Payment of assistance. Subject to a separate 18appropriation made for such purposes, payment of any 19scholarship awarded under this Act shall be determined by the 20Commission. All scholarship funds distributed in accordance 21with this Act shall be paid to the institution of higher 22learning on behalf of the recipients. Scholarship funds are 23applicable toward 2 semesters of enrollment within an academic 24year.    SB1322- 5 -LRB104 07394 LNS 17435 b1    Section 90. Administration and rulemaking. The Commission 2shall administer the scholarship program established by this 3Act and shall make all necessary and proper rules not 4inconsistent with this Act for its effective implementation.